Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 4 Solar Power Free-Market Financing

Effective date. —

This part became effective July 1, 2015.

46-3-60.
Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Solar Power Free-Market Financing Act of 2015.”

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.

46-3-61.
Findings.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is in the public interest to facilitate customers of electric service providers to invest in and install on their property solar technologies of their choice;

Free-market financing of solar technologies may provide more customers with opportunities to install solar technology;

Solar energy procurement agreements, and other similar financing arrangements, including those in which the payments are based on the performance and output of the solar technology installed on the property of customers of electric service providers, are financing arrangements which may help reduce or eliminate upfront costs involved in solar technology investments and installation by such customers; and

Individuals and entities which offer or receive such financing opportunities through solar energy procurement agreements pursuant to this part should not be considered or treated as electric service providers.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.

46-3-62.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Affiliate” means any entity directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with an electric service provider.

“Capacity limit” means a peak generating capacity in alternating current that is no greater than:

Ten kilowatts, for a residential application; or

One hundred and twenty-five percent of the actual or expected maximum annual peak demand of the premises the solar technology serves, for a commercial application.

“Control” means the power to significantly influence the management and policies of any affiliate, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise.

“Electric service provider” means any electric supplier that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to retail electric customers in this state.

“Electric supplier” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (3) of Code Section 46-3-3.

“Entity” means any business entity, including, but not limited to, a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or sole proprietorship.

“Maximum annual peak demand” means the maximum single hour electric demand actually occurring or expected to occur at a premises, measured at the premises’ electrical meter.

“Person” means any individual or entity.

“Premises” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (6) of Code Section 46-3-3.

“Property” means the tract of land on which a premises is located, together with all adjacent contiguous tracts of land utilized by the same retail electric customer.

“Retail electric customer” means a person who purchases electric service from an electric service provider for such person’s use and not for the purpose of resale.

“Solar energy procurement agreement” means any agreement, lease, or other arrangement under which a solar financing agent finances the installation, operation, or both of solar technology in which the payments are based on the performance and output of the solar technology installed on the property.

“Solar financing agent” means any person, including an electric service provider and an affiliate, whose business includes the leasing, financing, or installation of solar technology.

“Solar technology” means a system that:

Generates electric energy that is fueled solely by ambient sunlight;

Is installed upon property owned or occupied by a retail electric customer; and

Is connected to the electric service provider’s distribution system on either side of the electric service provider’s meter.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.

46-3-63.
Financing of solar technology; electric service provider prohibited from interfering with use of solar technology; electric service provider not liable for certain acts.

Solar technology at or below the capacity limit may be financed by a retail electric customer through a solar financing agent utilizing a solar energy procurement agreement, provided that:

Such solar technology and the installation thereof complies with all applicable state laws and all applicable county and municipal ordinances and permitting requirements; and

The retail electric customer or the solar financing agent gives notice to the electric service provider serving the premises at least 30 days prior to operation of such solar technology.

No electric service provider shall prevent or otherwise interfere with the installation, operation, or financing of solar technology by a retail electric customer through a solar financing agent pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, except that an electric service provider may require the retail electric customer to meet applicable safety, power quality, and interconnection requirements as provided in Code Section 46-3-64.

An electric service provider not acting as a solar financing agent at the specific property where the liability arises shall not be liable for any loss of assets, injury, or death that may arise from, be caused by, or relate to:

The act, or failure to act, of the retail electric customer or the solar financing agent relating to the solar technology;

The solar energy procurement agreement or any other agreement between the retail electric customer and the solar financing agent; or

The solar technology.

A solar financing agent which is not an electric service provider or affiliate may provide solar energy procurement agreements authorized by this part, notwithstanding the restrictions of Part 1 of this article.

A property with multiple premises may have multiple solar technologies financed by solar energy procurement agreements; provided, however, that a single solar technology is not connected to multiple premises and that the cumulative capacity of solar technologies connected to a premises shall not exceed the capacity limit. Solar technology installed to serve one premises shall only generate electric energy that is used on and by such premises or fed back to an electric service provider.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.

46-3-64.
Requirements upon a retail electric customer utilizing solar technology connected to an electric system of an electric service provider.

For solar technology with a peak generating capacity of not more than 10 kilowatts for a residential application and not more than 100 kilowatts for a commercial application, the electric service provider may require the retail electric customer or solar financing agent to provide, at the retail electric customer’s or solar financing agent’s expense, all equipment necessary to meet applicable safety, power quality, and interconnection requirements established by the National Electrical Code, National Electrical Safety Code, Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and Underwriters Laboratories, prior to interconnecting the solar technology to the electric service provider’s electric system. If such applicable safety, power quality, and interconnection requirements are met, an electric service provider shall not require compliance with additional safety or performance standards, require the performance of or payment for additional tests, or require the purchase of additional liability insurance.

For solar technology with a peak generating capacity of more than 10 kilowatts for a residential application and more than 100 kilowatts for a commercial application, the electric service provider may require compliance with additional requirements beyond those specified in subsection (a) of this Code section. Such additional requirements shall include only those necessary to protect public safety, power quality, and system reliability.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.

46-3-65.
Clarification of who shall be considered an electric supplier and an electric service provider.

Provided that the solar technology does not exceed the capacity limit, the leasing, financing, or installation of such solar technology through a solar energy procurement agreement shall not be considered the provision of electric service to the public, retail electric service, or retail supply of electricity by the solar financing agent, and neither the retail electric customer nor the solar financing agent shall be considered an electric supplier within the meaning of Part 1 of this article or in violation of exclusive electric service rights arising therein.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a solar financing agent’s actions under this part shall not cause the solar financing agent to be considered an electric service provider for any purpose under this title.

Any electric service provider or affiliate shall be authorized to become a solar financing agent; provided, however, that the restrictions of Part 1 of this article shall apply to any such electric service provider’s provision of solar technology. An electric service provider and an affiliate shall be subject to subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-11 in providing services as a solar financing agent.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.

46-3-66.
Construction and applicability.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 46-3-63 and subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 46-3-65, nothing in this part shall be construed as modifying the restrictions of Part 1 of this article on the sale, offer for sale, or distribution of retail electric service in this state.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to create or alter rights in real property or to change any restrictions or regulations on the use of real property that may exist under any means, including, but not limited to, a covenant, contract, ordinance, or state or federal law.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to restrict, affect, or diminish the ability of any county or municipality to adopt or enforce ordinances, permits, or regulations, or otherwise to exercise any lawful power under the Constitution or laws of this state, including, without limitation, those affecting zoning, land use, or the use of public rights of way.

Nothing in this part shall be applied to impair any obligation or right under a contract entered into prior to the effective date of this part or any amendment to or extension of such contract.

Nothing in this part shall be applied to any party to a wholesale electric power or transmission service contract entered into prior to the effective date of this part or to any original party to such contract that is subsequently amended or extended to the extent that the financing and installation of the solar technology would cause such party to be in breach of such contract or increase the costs of such contract by $100,000.00 or more. Any legal successor to substantially all rights and assets of a party shall also be considered a party under this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1438, § 1/HB 57.